District of Columbia statutes.
40-303.15

Entry of satisfaction.

Whenever any person having a lien by virtue hereof shall have received satisfaction of his claim and cost, he shall, on the demand, and at the cost of the person interested, enter said claim satisfied, in the clerk’s office aforesaid, and on his failure or refusal so to do he shall forfeit $50 to the party aggrieved, and all damages that the latter may have sustained by reason of such failure or refusal.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1387, ch. 854, § 1253
1981 Ed., § 38-117.
1973 Ed., § 38-117.